Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1401
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, how cited; applicability of amendments.

Sections 60-1401 to 60-1441 shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Any amendments to the act shall apply to franchises subject to the act which are entered into, amended, altered, modified, renewed, or extended after the date of the amendments to the act except as otherwise specifically provided in the act.

All amendments to the act shall apply upon the issuance or renewal of a dealer's or manufacturer's license.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB477, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB133, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 39;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 112;

Laws 2024, LB484, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 65.
October 1, 2026